Washington statutes.
RCW 35.43.005

Municipal local improvement statutes applicable to public corporations.

The provisions of this and the following chapters relating to municipal local improvements apply to local improvements owned or operated by a public corporation or by a public corporation and a city, town, or another public corporation as if they were owned or operated by a city or town. Whenever a section in such chapters refers to improvements made by, ordered by, owned by, operated by, constructed by, acquired by, or otherwise provided for or undertaken by a city or town or other municipality, it shall be construed to refer also to improvements made by, ordered by, owned by, operated by, constructed by, acquired by, or otherwise provided for or undertaken by a public corporation.

[ 1987 c 242 s 6.]

NOTES:

Policy—1987 c 242: "It is declared to be the public policy of the state that public improvements owned and operated by public corporations that confer special benefits on property, including without limitation museum, cultural, or arts facilities or structures, should be able to use the local improvement district financing of municipalities." [ 1987 c 242 s 1.]